resultats/hunspell/catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: sortir
SFX 8D Y 70
SFX 8D r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 8D r nt/_C ir
SFX 8D r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 8D r da/_Y ir
SFX 8D r ts/_Y ir
SFX 8D r des/_Y ir
SFX 8D ortir urto/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urt/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urts/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urt/_Z ir
SFX 8D r m/_Z ir
SFX 8D r u/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urten/_Z ir
SFX 8D r a/_Z ir
SFX 8D r es/_Z ir
SFX 8D r a/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 8D r en/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8D r res/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ré/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 8D r rà/_Z ir
SFX 8D r rem/_Z ir
SFX 8D r reu/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ran/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ries/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8D r rien/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urta/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urti/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urtes/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urtis/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urta/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urti/_Z ir
SFX 8D r m/_Z ir
SFX 8D r u/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urten/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urtin/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 8D r res/_Z ir
SFX 8D r sses/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8D ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8D r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 8D ortir urt/_C ir
SFX 8D ortir urta/_D ir
SFX 8D ortir urti/_D ir
SFX 8D r m/_C ir
SFX 8D r u/_C ir
SFX 8D ortir urten/_C ir
SFX 8D ortir urtin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: subjaure
SFX 8E Y 72
SFX 8E e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 8E ure ient/_C re
SFX 8E ure gut/_v_Y re
SFX 8E ure guda/_Y re
SFX 8E ure guts/_Y re
SFX 8E ure gudes/_Y re
SFX 8E ure c/_Z re
SFX 8E re s/_Z re
SFX 8E re 0/_Z re
SFX 8E ure iem/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eim/_Z re
SFX 8E ure ieu/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eis/_Z re
SFX 8E re en/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eia/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eies/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eia/_Z re
SFX 8E aure èiem/_Z re
SFX 8E aure èieu/_Z re
SFX 8E aure eien/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guí/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gué/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 8E e é/_Z re
SFX 8E e às/_Z re
SFX 8E e à/_Z re
SFX 8E e em/_Z re
SFX 8E e eu/_Z re
SFX 8E e an/_Z re
SFX 8E e ia/_Z re
SFX 8E e ies/_Z re
SFX 8E e ia/_Z re
SFX 8E e íem/_Z re
SFX 8E e íeu/_Z re
SFX 8E e ien/_Z re
SFX 8E ure ga/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gui/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gues/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guis/_Z re
SFX 8E ure ga/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gui/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guem/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gueu/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guen/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guin/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gués/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guera/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guessis/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guesses/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gués/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guera/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guéssim/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guéssem/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guésseu/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 8E ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 8E ure guessen/_Z re
SFX 8E re 0/_C re
SFX 8E ure ga/_D re
SFX 8E ure gui/_D re
SFX 8E ure guem/_C re
SFX 8E ure ieu/_C re
SFX 8E aure eis/_C re
SFX 8E ure guen/_C re
SFX 8E ure guin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: teixir
SFX 8F Y 107
SFX 8F r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 8F r nt/_C ir
SFX 8F r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 8F r da/_Y ir
SFX 8F r ts/_Y ir
SFX 8F r des/_Y ir
SFX 8F ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 8F r sc/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ix/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 8F r xes/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixes/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 8F r x/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ix/_Z ir
SFX 8F r m/_Z ir
SFX 8F r u/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 8F r xen/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixen/_Z ir
SFX 8F r a/_Z ir
SFX 8F r es/_Z ir
SFX 8F r a/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r en/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8F r res/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ré/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 8F r rà/_Z ir
SFX 8F r rem/_Z ir
SFX 8F r reu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ran/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ries/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r rien/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 8F r sca/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixa/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixi/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 8F r sques/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixes/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixis/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 8F r sca/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixa/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixi/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 8F r m/_Z ir
SFX 8F r guem/_Z ir
SFX 8F r u/_Z ir
SFX 8F r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 8F r squen/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixen/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 8F eixir ixin/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 8F r res/_Z ir
SFX 8F r sses/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8F r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir eix/_C ir
SFX 8F r x/_C ir
SFX 8F eixir ix/_C ir
SFX 8F ir esca/_D ir
SFX 8F r sca/_D ir
SFX 8F eixir ixa/_D ir
SFX 8F ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 8F eixir ixi/_D ir
SFX 8F ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 8F r m/_C ir
SFX 8F r guem/_C ir
SFX 8F r u/_C ir
SFX 8F ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 8F r squen/_C ir
SFX 8F eixir ixen/_C ir
SFX 8F ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 8F eixir ixin/_C ir
SFX 8F ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: tenir
SFX 90 Y 113
SFX 90 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 90 enir indre/_v_D_Y ir
SFX 90 r nt/_C ir
SFX 90 enir ingut/_v_Y ir
SFX 90 ir gut/_v_Y ir
SFX 90 enir inguda/_Y ir
SFX 90 ir guda/_Y ir
SFX 90 enir inguts/_Y ir
SFX 90 ir guts/_Y ir
SFX 90 enir ingudes/_Y ir
SFX 90 ir gudes/_Y ir
SFX 90 enir inc/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir c/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir s/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir é/_Z ir
SFX 90 r m/_Z ir
SFX 90 r u/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 90 r a/_Z ir
SFX 90 r es/_Z ir
SFX 90 r a/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 90 r en/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguí/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guí/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gueres/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingué/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gué/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guérem/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guéreu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gueren/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indré/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dré/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indràs/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dràs/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indrà/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir drà/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indrem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir drem/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indreu/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dreu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indran/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dran/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indries/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dries/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indríem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dríem/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indríeu/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir dríeu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir indrien/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir drien/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingues/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gues/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guis/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguis/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guem/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingueu/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gueu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguen/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guin/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguin/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguessis/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguesses/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guessis/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguéssim/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguéssem/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guéssim/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguésseu/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguessin/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 90 enir inguessen/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir guessin/_Z ir
SFX 90 ir 0/_C ir
SFX 90 enir ingues/_C ir
SFX 90 enir é/_C ir
SFX 90 enir in/_C ir
SFX 90 enir inga/_D ir
SFX 90 ir gui/_D ir
SFX 90 enir ingui/_D ir
SFX 90 enir inguem/_C ir
SFX 90 ir guem/_C ir
SFX 90 r u/_C ir
SFX 90 enir ingueu/_C ir
SFX 90 enir inguen/_C ir
SFX 90 ir guin/_C ir
SFX 90 enir inguin/_C ir
